Maine, session 132, LD34.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §13406, as amended by PL 2019, c. 343, Pt. UU, §1, is
repealed.
Sec. 2. 20-A MRSA §13407, as amended by PL 2021, c. 441, §1, is repealed.
Sec. 3. 20-A MRSA §13408 is enacted to read:
§13408. Minimum salaries beginning in 2026-2027 school year
Each school administrative unit shall establish a minimum salary for certified teachers
and career and technical education teachers as follows:
1. School year 2026-2027. For the school year starting after June 30, 2026, the
minimum salary is $45,000;
2. School year 2027-2028. For the school year starting after June 30, 2027, the
minimum salary is $47,500;
3. School year 2028-2029. For the school year starting after June 30, 2028, the
minimum salary is $50,000;
4. School year 2029-2030. For the school year starting after June 30, 2029, the
minimum salary is $52,500; and
5. School years beginning in or after 2030. For the school year starting after June
30, 2030, the minimum salary for certified teachers and career and technical education
teachers must increase by multiplying the amount of the salary by the cost-of-living
adjustment. For each subsequent year, the previous year's adjusted minimum salary for
certified teachers and career and technical education teachers must increase by multiplying
the amount of the adjusted minimum salary by the cost-of-living adjustment. For purposes
of this subsection, "cost-of-living adjustment" means the Chained Consumer Price Index
for the 12-month period ending June 30th of the preceding calendar year divided by the
Chained Consumer Price Index for the 12-month period ending June 30th of the calendar
year in which the adjustment is effective and "Chained Consumer Price Index" has the same
meaning as in Title 36, section 5402, subsection 1.
A school administrative unit shall provide to the department annually on or before
October 1st the number of certified teachers and career and technical education teachers
eligible for incremental salary increases as defined in section 15689, subsection 7‑A,
paragraph A.
Sec. 4. 20-A MRSA §15689, sub-§7-A, as amended by PL 2021, c. 441, §2, is
further amended to read:
7-A. Adjustment for minimum teacher salary. Beginning in fiscal year 2020-21
2026-27, the commissioner shall, in accordance with this subsection, increase the state
share of the total allocation to a qualifying school administrative unit by an amount
necessary to achieve the minimum salary for certified teachers and career and technical
education teachers established in section 13407 13408.
A. As used in this subsection, unless the context otherwise indicates, "qualifying
school administrative unit" means a school administrative unit that the commissioner
determines to have a locally established salary schedule with a minimum teacher salary
Page 1 - 132LR0233(01)

412 of less than $40,000 $45,000 in school year 2019-2020 2026-2027. As used in this
423 subsection, unless the context otherwise indicates, "incremental salary increases"
434 means the incremental increases in the salaries of certified teachers and career and
445 technical education teachers employed by a qualifying school administrative unit in
456 school year 2019-2020 2026-2027 necessary to meet the minimum salary requirements
467 of section 13407 13408 from fiscal year 2020-21 2026-27 to fiscal year 2022-23 2028-
478 29.
B. The commissioner shall allocate the funds appropriated by the Legislature in
accordance with the following.
(1) The amount of increased funds provided to qualifying school administrative
units under this subsection must be the amount necessary to fund the incremental
salary increases specified in this subsection.
(2) The number of certified teachers and career and technical education teachers
eligible for incremental salary increases in a qualifying school administrative unit
for a fiscal year must be based on the information supplied to the department
pursuant to section 13407 13408 in that fiscal year.
(3) The increased funds provided under this subsection must be issued to
qualifying school administrative units as an adjustment to the state school subsidy
for distribution to the certified teachers and career and technical education
teachers. Qualifying school administrative units shall use the payments provided
under this subsection to provide salary adjustments to those certified teachers and
career and technical education teachers eligible for incremental salary increases.
The department shall collect the necessary data to allow the funds to be included
in a qualifying school administrative unit's monthly subsidy payments beginning
no later than February 1st of each fiscal year.
(4) Funding for incremental salary increases in fiscal year 2020-21 2026-27 must
be based on data submitted to the department and certified by school administrative
units as of October 1, 2019 2025.
This subsection is repealed July 1, 2028.
Sec. 5. Effective date. This Act takes effect June 30, 2026.